phonology/01_weak_roots.xfst
!
! 01_weak_roots.xfst - Weak Root Realization Rules
! Apply weak root adjustments before other phonology
!
! References: Joüon-Muraoka §§53-58, GKC §§73-84
!

!
! ============================================================
! III-he apocope (היקה)
! When ה is at word end in Qal imperfect, itapheres
! ============================================================

define III_he_Apocope
  [h] -> 0 || y i _ #   .


!
! ============================================================
! I-nun assimilation
! Initial nun assimilates to following consonant with dagesh forte
! ============================================================

define I_Nun_Assimilation
  n -> d: || _ [ b | g | d | k | p | t | m | n | r | l | s | š ] .
  
!
! ============================================================
! I-waw/yod reduction
! ו or י in position 2 reduces to shwa before non-vowel
! ============================================================

define I_Waw_Reduction
  w -> 0 || [C]:_ [C]: .
  
define I_Yod_Reduction  
  y -> 0 || [C]:_ [C]: .

!
! ============================================================
! Hollow verb vowel insertion
! Hollow verbs get theme vowel in certain cells
! ============================================================

define Hollow_Vowel_a
  [w,y] -> a || qatal _ .
  
define Hollow_Vowel_o
  [w,y] -> o || yiqtol _ .

!
! ============================================================
! Geminate gemination
! Geminate roots double C1 in Piel/Hithpael
! ============================================================

define Geminate_Gemination
  C -> d:C || C _ [i,e].

!
! ============================================================
! Compose all weak root rules
! Applied in this order
! ============================================================

define WeakRootRules
  III_he_Apocope
  .o.
  I_Nun_Assimilation
  .o.
  I_Waw_Reduction
  .o.
  I_Yod_Reduction
  .o.
  Hollow_Vowel_a
  .o.
  Hollow_Vowel_o
  .o.
  Geminate_Gemination
;

regex WeakRootRules;
